test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 3Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikî-wîcihin	# you helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kikî-wîcihik	# he/she helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân	# you helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonaw	# he/she helped you and us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâw	# he/she helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwak	# you helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwa	# you helped another/others
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihimîw	# he/she helped yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kikî-wîcihitinân	# we helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nikî-wîcihânân	# we helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihitinân	# we helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nikî-wîcihânânak	# we helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nikî-wîcihimânâna	# we helped another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kikî-wîcihânaw	# we and you helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kikî-wîcihânawak	# we and you helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimânawa	# we and you helped another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kikî-wîcihinâwâw	# you all helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kikî-wîcihâwâw	# you all helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân	# you all helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwâwak	# you all helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwâwa	# you all helped another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: [nikî-wîcihikowak, nikî-wîcihikwak]	# they helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: [kikî-wîcihikowak, kikî-wîcihikwak]	# they helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikonânak	# they helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonawak	# they helped you and us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâwak	# they helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihîwak	# they helped another/others
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihimîwak	# they helped yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nikî-wîcihikothiwa	# another/others helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kikî-wîcihikothiwa	# another/others helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [kî-wîcihikow, kî-wîcihik]	# another/others helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikonâna	# another/others helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kikî-wîcihikonawa	# another/others helped you and us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikowâwa	# another/others helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [kî-wîcihikowak, kî-wîcihikwak]	# another/others helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihîthiwa	# another/others helped yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihikothiwa	# yet another/others helped another/others

      # X
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nikî-wîcihikawin	# someone helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kikî-wîcihikawin	# someone helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: kî-wîcihâw	# someone helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikawinân	# someone helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kikî-wîcihikawinaw, kikî-wîcihikawinânaw]	# someone helped you and us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikawinâwâw	# someone helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: kî-wîcihâwak	# someone helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihâthiwa	# someone helped another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Prt # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihitân	# as I helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihak	# as I helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihitakok	# as I helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihakik	# as I helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimak	# as I helped another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihithan	# as you helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihat	# as you helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihithâhk	# as you helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihacik	# as you helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimat	# as you helped another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihithan	# as you helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihisk	# as he/she helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihithâhk	# as you helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothahk	# as he/she helped you and us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothîk	# as he/she helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihacik	# as you helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimat	# as you helped another/others
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimât	# as he/she helped yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihitâhk	# as we helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâthâhk	# as we helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihitâhk	# as we helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâthâhkik	# as we helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâthâhk	# as we helped another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâthahk	# as we and you helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâthahkok	# as we and you helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâthahk	# as we and you helped another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihithîk	# as you all helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâthîk	# as you all helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihithâhk	# as you all helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâthîkok	# as you all helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâthîk	# as you all helped another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihicik	# as they helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihiskik	# as they helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothâhkik	# as they helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothahkok	# as they helped you and us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothîkok	# as they helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihâcik	# as they helped another/others
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâcik	# as they helped yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihimit	# as another/others helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihimisk	# as another/others helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihikot	# as another/others helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothâhk	# as another/others helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothahk	# as another/others helped you and us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothîk	# as another/others helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihikocik	# as another/others helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihâthit	# as another/others helped yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothit	# as yet another/others helped another/others

      # X
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihikawithân	# as someone helped me
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihikawithan	# as someone helped you
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihiht	# as someone helped him/her
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawithâhk	# as someone helped us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawithahk	# as someone helped you and us
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawithîk	# as someone helped you all
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihihcik	# as someone helped them
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimiht	# as someone helped another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/e+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihitin	# I am going to help you
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-wîcihâw	# I am going to help him/her
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihitinâwâw	# I am going to help you all
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-wîcihâwak	# I am going to help them
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-wîcihimâwa	# I am going to help another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-wîcihin	# you are going to help me
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-wîcihâw	# you are going to help him/her
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-wîcihinân	# you are going to help us
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihâwak	# you are going to help them
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimâwa	# you are going to help another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-wîcihin	# you are going to help me
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihik	# he/she is going to help you
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-wîcihinân	# you are going to help us
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-wîcihikonaw	# he/she is going to help you and us
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihikowâw	# he/she is going to help you all
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihâwak	# you are going to help them
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimâwa	# you are going to help another/others
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihimîw	# he/she is going to help yet another/others
